Mississippi, session 2026, HB1457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. For any utility service customers in the Town of Walnut whose gas and water meters were not read for the five (5) year period immediately preceding the effective date of this act, such debt shall be forgiven for amounts accrued until the effective date of this act. After the effective date of this act, such customers shall be liable for all charges for water and/or gas services provided to a customer after such date. SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.